ja: 織りタイプ: ブロケード; シャルムーズ; シフォン; クレープ・ド・シン; デュピオーニ; ファイユ; ガーゼ; ジョーゼット; 羽二重; ジャカード; ノイル; オーガンジー; サテン; シャンタン; タフタ; ツイル; ベルベット (シルクベルベット); その他
nb: Vevetype: Brokade; Charmeuse; Chiffon; Crepe de chine; Dupioni; Faille; Gas; Georgette; Habotai; Jacquard; Noil; Organza; Sateng; Shantung; Taft; Twill; Fløyel (silkefløyel); Annet
nl: Weefsel type: Brokaat; Charmeuse; Chiffon; Crêpe de chine; Dupioni; Faille; Gaas; Georgette; Habotai; Jacquard; Noil; Organza; Satijn; Shantung; Taft; Twill; Fluweel (zijden fluweel); Overig
pt-BR: Trama tipo: Brocado; Charmeuse; Chiffon; Crepe de chine; Dupioni; Faille; Gaze; Georgette; Habotai; Jacquard; Noil; Organza; Cetim; Xantungue; Tafetá; Sarja; Veludo (veludo de seda); Outro
en: Weave type: Brocade; Charmeuse; Chiffon; Crepe de chine; Dupioni; Faille; Gauze; Georgette; Habotai; Jacquard; Noil; Organza; Satin; Shantung; Taffeta; Twill; Velvet (silk velvet); Other
zh-CN: 编织类型: 锦缎; 查米尤斯缎; 雪纺; 双绉; 双宫绸; 罗缎; 纱布; 乔其纱; 电力纺; 提花; 绢丝; 欧根纱; 缎面; 山东绸; 塔夫绸; 斜纹; 天鹅绒（真丝天鹅绒）; 其他
th: ประเภทการทอ: ผ้าทอยกดอก; ผ้าชาร์มิวส์; ผ้าชีฟอง; ผ้าเครปเดอชีน; ผ้าไหมดูปิโอนี; ผ้าฟายล์; ผ้าสาลู; ผ้าจอร์เจีย; ผ้าฮาโบไต; ผ้าแจ็กการ์ด; ผ้าไหมนอยล์; ผ้าออร์แกนซ่า; ผ้าซาติน; ผ้าชานตง; ผ้าแพรแข็ง; ผ้าลายทแยง; ผ้ากำมะหยี่ (กำมะหยี่ไหม); อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta vezave: Brokat; Charmeuse; Šifon; Krep dešin; Dupioni; Faille; Gaza; Žoržet; Habotai; Žakard; Buret (noil); Organza; Saten; Šantung; Taft; Keper; Žamet (svileni žamet); Drugo
vi: Kiểu dệt: Gấm; Charmeuse; Chiffon; Crepe de chine; Dupioni; Faille; Vải gạc; Georgette; Habotai; Jacquard; Lụa thô; Organza; Satin; Shantung; Taffeta; Dệt chéo; Nhung (nhung lụa); Khác
bg-BG: Тип сплитка: Брокат; Шармьоз; Шифон; Крепдешин; Дюпион; Фай; Марля; Жоржет; Хаботай; Жакард; Ноил; Органза; Сатен; Шантунг; Тафта; Кепър; Кадифе (копринено кадифе); Други
el: Τύπος ύφανσης: Μπροκάρ; Σαρμέζ; Σιφόν; Κρεπ ντε σιν; Ντουπιόνι; Φάιγ; Γάζα; Ζορζέτα; Χαμποτάι; Ζακάρ; Noil; Οργάντζα; Σατέν; Σαντούνγκ; Ταφτάς; Τουίλ; Βελούδο (μεταξωτό βελούδο); Άλλο
fr: Type de tissage: Brocart; Charmeuse; Mousseline; Crêpe de Chine; Dupioni; Faille; Gaze; Georgette; Habotai; Jacquard; Bourrette; Organza; Satin; Shantung; Taffetas; Sergé; Velours (velours de soie); Autre
sv: Vävtyp: Brokad; Charmeuse; Chiffong; Crêpe de chine; Dupioni; Faille; Gasväv; Georgette; Habotai; Jacquard; Noil; Organza; Satin; Shantung; Taft; Kypert; Sammet (sidensammet); Övrigt
es: Tipo de tejido: Brocado; Charmeuse; Chifón; Crepé de China; Dupioni; Falla; Gasa; Georgette; Habotai; Jacquard; Noil; Organza; Satén; Shantung; Tafetán; Sarga; Terciopelo (terciopelo de seda); Otro
hr-HR: Vrsta tkanja: Brokat; Charmeuse; Šifon; Crepe de chine; Dupion; Faille; Gaza; Žoržet; Habotai; Žakard; Noil; Organza; Saten; Šantung; Taft; Keper; Baršun (svileni baršun); Ostalo
tr: Dokuma türü: Brokar; Şarmöz; Şifon; Krep deşin; Dupiyon; Fay; Tülbent; Jorjet; Habotai; Jakarlı; Buret; Organze; Saten; Şantung; Tafta; Dimi; Kadife (ipek kadife); Diğer
da: Vævningstype: Brokade; Charmeuse; Chiffon; Crepe de chine; Dupioni; Faille; Gaze; Georgette; Habotai; Jacquard; Noil; Organza; Satin; Shantung; Taft; Twill; Velour (silkevelour); Andet
ru: Тип плетения: Парча; Шармез; Шифон; Крепдешин; Дюпион; Фай; Газ; Жоржет; Хаботай; Жаккард; Бурет; Органза; Сатин; Шантунг; Тафта; Твил; Бархат (шелковый бархат); Другое
fi: Kudostyyppi: Brokadi; Charmeuse; Sifonki; Crepe de chine; Dupion; Faille; Harso; Georgette; Habotai; Jacquard; Noil; Organza; Satiini; Shantung; Tafti; Toimikas; Sametti (silkkisametti); Muu
ko: 직조 방식: 브로케이드; 샤르무즈; 시폰; 크레이프 드 신; 두피오니; 파유; 거즈; 조젯; 하보타이; 자카드; 노일; 오간자; 새틴; 샹퉁; 태피터; 트윌; 벨벳(실크 벨벳); 기타
lt-LT: Pynimo tipas: Brokatas; Šarmezas; Šifonas; Krepdešinas; Dupionas; Fajus; Marlė; Žoržetas; Habotajus; Žakardas; Buretas; Organza; Satinas; Šantungas; Tafta; Ruoželinis; Aksomas (šilko aksomas); Kita
zh-TW: 編織類型: 織錦; 查米斯縐緞; 雪紡; 雙縐絲; 雙宮絲; 羅緞; 紗布; 喬其紗; 羽二重; 緹花; 紬絲; 歐根紗; 緞面; 山東綢; 塔夫綢; 斜紋; 絲絨 (真絲絲絨); 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de trama: Brocado; Charmeuse; Chiffon; Crepe de chine; Dupioni; Faille; Gaze; Georgette; Habotai; Jacquard; Noil; Organza; Cetim; Shantung; Tafetá; Sarja; Veludo (veludo de seda); Outro
it: Tipo di tessitura: Broccato; Charmeuse; Chiffon; Crêpe de chine; Dupioni; Faille; Garza; Georgette; Habotai; Jacquard; Noil; Organza; Raso; Shantung; Taffettà; Twill; Velluto (velluto di seta); Altro
pl: Typ splotu: Brokat; Charmeuse; Szyfon; Krepa de chine; Dupioni; Faille; Gaza; Żorżeta; Habotai; Żakard; Buret; Organza; Satyna; Szantung; Tafta; Splot skośny; Aksamit (aksamit jedwabny); Inne
hu: Szövés típusa: Brokát; Charmeuse; Sifon; Crepe de chine; Dupioni; Faille; Géz; Zsorzsett; Habotai; Zsakárd; Buret; Organza; Szatén; Santung; Taft; Sávoly; Bársony (selyembársony); Egyéb
de: Webart: Brokat; Charmeuse; Chiffon; Crêpe de Chine; Dupion; Faille; Gaze; Georgette; Habotai; Jacquard; Noil; Organza; Satin; Shantung; Taft; Twill; Samt (Seidensamt); Andere
ro-RO: Tipul țesăturii: Brocart; Charmeuse; Șifon; Crep de chine; Dupioni; Faille; Tifon; Georgette; Habotai; Jacquard; Noil; Organza; Satin; Shantung; Tafta; Twill; Catifea (catifea din mătase); Altele
sk-SK: Typ väzby: Brokát; Šarmez; Šifón; Krepdešín; Dupion; Faille; Gáza; Žoržet; Habutai; Žakár; Buret; Organza; Satén; Šantung; Taft; Keper; Zamat (hodvábny zamat); Iné
cs: Typ vazby: Brokát; Charmeuse; Šifon; Krepdešín; Dupion; Faille; Gáza; Žoržet; Habotai; Žakár; Buret; Organza; Satén; Šantung; Taft; Kepr; Samet (hedvábný samet); Jiný